src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kissa_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - tobdo: #KISSA
    tobdo+N+Sg+Nom:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Gen:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Acc:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Ill:  toobdon
    tobdo+N+Sg+Loc:  tobdoost
    tobdo+N+Sg+Com:  tobdoin
    tobdo+N+Sg+Abe:  tobdottáá
    tobdo+N+Ess:  tobdon
    tobdo+N+Par:  tobdod
    tobdo+N+Pl+Nom:  tobdoh
    tobdo+N+Pl+Gen:  tobdoi
    tobdo+N+Pl+Acc:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Ill:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Loc:  tobdoin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Com:  [tobdoiguin, tobdoigijn]
    tobdo+N+Pl+Abe:  tobdoittáá

  Noun - tulppá: # - ok
    tulppá+N+Sg+Nom:  tulppá
    tulppá+N+Sg+Gen:  tulpá
    tulppá+N+Sg+Acc:  tulpá
    tulppá+N+Sg+Ill:  tuulpán
    tulppá+N+Sg+Loc:  tulppáást
    tulppá+N+Sg+Com:  tulppáin
    tulppá+N+Sg+Abe:  tulpáttáá
    tulppá+N+Ess:  tulppán
    tulppá+N+Par:  tulppád
    tulppá+N+Pl+Nom:  tulpáh
    tulppá+N+Pl+Gen:  [tulpái, tuulpái]
    tulppá+N+Pl+Acc: tuulpáid # Should it be tulppáid, like elsewhere?
    tulppá+N+Pl+Ill:  tulppáid
    tulppá+N+Pl+Loc:  tulppáin
    tulppá+N+Pl+Com:  [tulpáiguin, tulpáigijn]
    tulppá+N+Pl+Abe:  tulpáittáá
 
  Noun - oljo: #KISSA
    oljo+N+Sg+Nom:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Gen:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Acc:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Ill:  ooljon
    oljo+N+Sg+Loc:  oljoost
    oljo+N+Sg+Com:  oljoin
    oljo+N+Sg+Abe:  oljottáá
    oljo+N+Ess:  oljon
    oljo+N+Par:  oljod
    oljo+N+Pl+Nom:  oljoh
    oljo+N+Pl+Gen:  oljoi
    oljo+N+Pl+Acc:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Ill:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Loc:  oljoin
    oljo+N+Pl+Com:  [oljoiguin, oljoigijn]
    oljo+N+Pl+Abe:  oljoittáá

  Noun - osko: #KISSA
    osko+N+Sg+Nom:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Gen:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Acc:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Ill:  ooskon
    osko+N+Sg+Loc:  oskoost
    osko+N+Sg+Com:  oskoin
    osko+N+Sg+Abe:  oskottáá
    osko+N+Ess:  oskon
    osko+N+Par:  oskod
    osko+N+Pl+Nom:  oskoh
    osko+N+Pl+Gen:  oskoi
    osko+N+Pl+Acc:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Ill:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Loc:  oskoin
    osko+N+Pl+Com:  [oskoiguin, oskoigijn]
    osko+N+Pl+Abe:  oskoittáá
    
  Noun - ronno: #KISSA
    ronno+N+Sg+Nom:  ronno
    ronno+N+Sg+Gen:  rono
    ronno+N+Sg+Acc:  rono
    ronno+N+Sg+Ill:  roonon
    ronno+N+Sg+Loc:  ronnoost
    ronno+N+Sg+Com:  ronnoin
    ronno+N+Sg+Abe:  ronottáá
    ronno+N+Ess:  ronnon
    ronno+N+Par:  ronnod
    ronno+N+Pl+Nom:  ronoh
    ronno+N+Pl+Gen:  ronoi
    ronno+N+Pl+Acc:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Ill:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Loc:  ronnoin
    ronno+N+Pl+Com:  [ronoiguin, ronoigijn]
    ronno+N+Pl+Abe:  ronoittáá

  Noun - potto: #KISSA
    potto+N+Sg+Nom:  potto
    potto+N+Sg+Gen:  poto
    potto+N+Sg+Acc:  poto
    potto+N+Sg+Ill:  pooton
    potto+N+Sg+Loc:  pottoost
    potto+N+Sg+Com:  pottoin
    potto+N+Sg+Abe:  potottáá
    potto+N+Ess:  potton
    potto+N+Par:  pottod
    potto+N+Pl+Nom:  potoh
    potto+N+Pl+Gen:  potoi
    potto+N+Pl+Acc:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Ill:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Loc:  pottoin
    potto+N+Pl+Com:  [potoiguin, potoigijn]
    potto+N+Pl+Abe:  potoittáá

  Noun - torvo: #KISSA
    torvo+N+Sg+Nom:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Gen:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Acc:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Ill:  toorvon
    torvo+N+Sg+Loc:  torvoost
    torvo+N+Sg+Com:  torvoin
    torvo+N+Sg+Abe:  torvottáá
    torvo+N+Ess:  torvon
    torvo+N+Par:  torvod
    torvo+N+Pl+Nom:  torvoh
    torvo+N+Pl+Gen:  torvoi
    torvo+N+Pl+Acc:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Ill:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Loc:  torvoin
    torvo+N+Pl+Com:  [torvoiguin, torvoigijn]
    torvo+N+Pl+Abe:  torvoittáá

  Noun - uddo: #KISSA
    uddo+N+Sg+Nom:  uddo
    uddo+N+Sg+Gen:  udo
    uddo+N+Sg+Acc:  udo
    uddo+N+Sg+Ill:  uudon
    uddo+N+Sg+Loc:  uddoost
    uddo+N+Sg+Com:  uddoin
    uddo+N+Sg+Abe:  udottáá
    uddo+N+Ess:  uddon
    uddo+N+Par:  uddod
    uddo+N+Pl+Nom:  udoh
    uddo+N+Pl+Gen:  udoi
    uddo+N+Pl+Acc:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Ill:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Loc:  uddoin
    uddo+N+Pl+Com:  [udoiguin, udoigijn]
    uddo+N+Pl+Abe:  udoittáá

  Noun - purdo: #KISSA
    purdo+N+Sg+Nom:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Gen:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Acc:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Ill:  puurdon
    purdo+N+Sg+Loc:  purdoost
    purdo+N+Sg+Com:  purdoin
    purdo+N+Sg+Abe:  purdottáá
    purdo+N+Ess:  purdon
    purdo+N+Par:  purdod
    purdo+N+Pl+Nom:  purdoh
    purdo+N+Pl+Gen:  purdoi
    purdo+N+Pl+Acc:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Ill:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Loc:  purdoin
    purdo+N+Pl+Com:  [purdoiguin, purdoigijn]
    purdo+N+Pl+Abe:  purdoittáá

  Noun - ruŋgo: #KISSA
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  ruŋgoost
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  ruŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  ruŋgottáá
    ruŋgo+N+Ess:  ruŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Par:  ruŋgod
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  ruŋgoh
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  ruŋgoi
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  ruŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  [ruŋgoiguin, ruŋgoigijn]
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  ruŋgoittáá

  Noun - urkko: #KISSA
    urkko+N+Sg+Nom:  urkko
    urkko+N+Sg+Gen:  urko
    urkko+N+Sg+Acc:  urko
    urkko+N+Sg+Ill:  uurkon
    urkko+N+Sg+Loc:  urkkoost
    urkko+N+Sg+Com:  urkkoin
    urkko+N+Sg+Abe:  urkottáá
    urkko+N+Ess:  urkkon
    urkko+N+Par:  urkkod
    urkko+N+Pl+Nom:  urkoh
    urkko+N+Pl+Gen:  urkoi
    urkko+N+Pl+Acc:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Ill:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Loc:  urkkoin
    urkko+N+Pl+Com:  [urkoiguin, urkoigijn]
    urkko+N+Pl+Abe:  urkoittáá

  Noun - puško: #KISSA
    puško+N+Sg+Nom:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Gen:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Acc:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Ill:  puuškon
    puško+N+Sg+Loc:  puškoost
    puško+N+Sg+Com:  puškoin
    puško+N+Sg+Abe:  puškottáá
    puško+N+Ess:  puškon
    puško+N+Par:  puškod
    puško+N+Pl+Nom:  puškoh
    puško+N+Pl+Gen:  puškoi
    puško+N+Pl+Acc:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Ill:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Loc:  puškoin
    puško+N+Pl+Com:  [puškoiguin, puškoigijn]
    puško+N+Pl+Abe:  puškoittáá

  Noun - ullo: #KISSA
    ullo+N+Sg+Nom:  ullo
    ullo+N+Sg+Gen:  ulo
    ullo+N+Sg+Acc:  ulo
    ullo+N+Sg+Ill:  uulon
    ullo+N+Sg+Loc:  ulloost
    ullo+N+Sg+Com:  ulloin
    ullo+N+Sg+Abe:  ulottáá
    ullo+N+Ess:  ullon
    ullo+N+Par:  ullod
    ullo+N+Pl+Nom:  uloh
    ullo+N+Pl+Gen:  uloi
    ullo+N+Pl+Acc:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Ill:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Loc:  ulloin
    ullo+N+Pl+Com:  [uloiguin, uloigijn]
    ullo+N+Pl+Abe:  uloittáá

  Noun - sutto: #KISSA
    sutto+N+Sg+Nom:  sutto
    sutto+N+Sg+Gen:  suto
    sutto+N+Sg+Acc:  suto
    sutto+N+Sg+Ill:  suuton
    sutto+N+Sg+Loc:  suttoost
    sutto+N+Sg+Com:  suttoin
    sutto+N+Sg+Abe:  sutottáá
    sutto+N+Ess:  sutton
    sutto+N+Par:  suttod
    sutto+N+Pl+Nom:  sutoh
    sutto+N+Pl+Gen:  sutoi
    sutto+N+Pl+Acc: suttoid
    sutto+N+Pl+Ill:  suttoid
    sutto+N+Pl+Loc:  suttoin
    sutto+N+Pl+Com:  [sutoiguin, sutoigijn]
    sutto+N+Pl+Abe:  sutoittáá

  Noun - mušto: #KISSA
    mušto+N+Sg+Nom:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Gen:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Acc:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Ill:  muušton
    mušto+N+Sg+Loc:  muštoost
    mušto+N+Sg+Com:  muštoin
    mušto+N+Sg+Abe:  muštottáá
    mušto+N+Ess:  mušton
    mušto+N+Par:  muštod
    mušto+N+Pl+Nom:  muštoh
    mušto+N+Pl+Gen:  muštoi
    mušto+N+Pl+Acc:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Ill:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Loc:  muštoin
    mušto+N+Pl+Com:  [muštoiguin, muštoigijn]
    mušto+N+Pl+Abe:  muštoittáá

  Noun - huilo: #KISSA
    huilo+N+Sg+Nom:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Gen:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Acc:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Ill:  huuilon
    huilo+N+Sg+Loc:  huiloost
    huilo+N+Sg+Com:  huiloin
    huilo+N+Sg+Abe:  huilottáá
    huilo+N+Ess:  huilon
    huilo+N+Par:  huilod
    huilo+N+Pl+Nom:  huiloh
    huilo+N+Pl+Gen:  huiloi
    huilo+N+Pl+Acc:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Ill:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Loc:  huiloin
    huilo+N+Pl+Com:  [huiloiguin, huiloigijn]
    huilo+N+Pl+Abe:  huiloittáá

  Noun - koško: #KISSA
    koško+N+Sg+Nom:  koško
    koško+N+Sg+Gen:  koško    
    koško+N+Sg+Acc:  koško
    koško+N+Sg+Ill:  kooškon
    koško+N+Sg+Loc:  koškoost
    koško+N+Sg+Com:  koškoin
    koško+N+Sg+Abe:  koškottáá
    koško+N+Ess:  koškon
    koško+N+Par:  koškod
    koško+N+Pl+Nom:  koškoh
    koško+N+Pl+Gen:  koškoi
    koško+N+Pl+Acc:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Ill:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Loc:  koškoin
    koško+N+Pl+Com:  [koškoiguin, koškoigijn]
    koško+N+Pl+Abe:  koškoittáá

  Noun - saŋkko: # ok KISSA
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Nom:  saŋkko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Gen:  saŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Acc:  saŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Ill:  saaŋkon
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Loc:  saŋkkoost
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Com:  saŋkkoin
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Abe:  saŋkottáá
    saŋkko+N+Ess:  saŋkkon
    saŋkko+N+Par:  saŋkkod
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Nom:  saŋkoh
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Gen:  saŋkoi
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Acc:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Ill:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Loc:  saŋkkoin
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Com:  [saŋkoiguin, saŋkoigijn]
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Abe:  saŋkoittáá


  Noun - lahko: # ok KISSA 
    lahko+N+Sg+Nom:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Gen:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Acc:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Ill:  laahkon
    lahko+N+Sg+Loc:  lahkoost
    lahko+N+Sg+Com:  lahkoin
    lahko+N+Sg+Abe:  lahkottáá
    lahko+N+Ess:  lahkon
    lahko+N+Par:  lahkod
    lahko+N+Pl+Nom:  lahkoh
    lahko+N+Pl+Gen:  lahkoi
    lahko+N+Pl+Acc:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Ill:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Loc:  lahkoin
    lahko+N+Pl+Com:  [lahkoiguin, lahkoigijn]
    lahko+N+Pl+Abe:  lahkoittáá

  Noun - šaddo: # ok KISSA
    šaddo+N+Sg+Nom:  šaddo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Gen:  šado
    šaddo+N+Sg+Acc:  šado
    šaddo+N+Sg+Ill:  šaadon
    šaddo+N+Sg+Loc:  šaddoost
    šaddo+N+Sg+Com:  šaddoin
    šaddo+N+Sg+Abe:  šadottáá
    šaddo+N+Ess:  šaddon
    šaddo+N+Par:  šaddod
    šaddo+N+Pl+Nom:  šadoh
    šaddo+N+Pl+Gen:  šadoi
    šaddo+N+Pl+Acc:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Ill:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Loc:  šaddoin
    šaddo+N+Pl+Com:  [šadoiguin, šadoigijn]
    šaddo+N+Pl+Abe:  šadoittáá

  Noun - pircco: #KISSA
    pircco+N+Sg+Nom:  pircco
    pircco+N+Sg+Gen:  pirco
    pircco+N+Sg+Acc:  pirco
    pircco+N+Sg+Ill:  piircon
    pircco+N+Sg+Loc:  pirccoost
    pircco+N+Sg+Com:  pirccoin
    pircco+N+Sg+Abe:  pircottáá
    pircco+N+Ess:  pirccon
    pircco+N+Par:  pirccod
    pircco+N+Pl+Nom:  pircoh
    pircco+N+Pl+Gen:  pircoi
    pircco+N+Pl+Acc:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Ill:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Loc:  pirccoin
    pircco+N+Pl+Com:  [pircoiguin, pircoigijn]
    pircco+N+Pl+Abe:  pircoittáá

  Noun - riddo: #KISSA
    riddo+N+Sg+Nom:  riddo
    riddo+N+Sg+Gen:  rido
    riddo+N+Sg+Acc:  rido
    riddo+N+Sg+Ill:  riidon
    riddo+N+Sg+Loc:  riddoost
    riddo+N+Sg+Com:  riddoin
    riddo+N+Sg+Abe:  ridottáá
    riddo+N+Ess:  riddon
    riddo+N+Par:  riddod
    riddo+N+Pl+Nom:  ridoh
    riddo+N+Pl+Gen:  ridoi
    riddo+N+Pl+Acc:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Ill:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Loc:  riddoin
    riddo+N+Pl+Com:  [ridoiguin, ridoigijn]
    riddo+N+Pl+Abe:  ridoittáá

  Noun - šiljo: #KISSA
    šiljo+N+Sg+Nom:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Gen:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Acc:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Ill:  šiiljon
    šiljo+N+Sg+Loc:  šiljoost
    šiljo+N+Sg+Com:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Sg+Abe:  šiljottáá
    šiljo+N+Ess:  šiljon
    šiljo+N+Par:  šiljod
    šiljo+N+Pl+Nom:  šiljoh
    šiljo+N+Pl+Gen:  šiljoi
    šiljo+N+Pl+Acc:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Ill:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Loc:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Com:  [šiljoiguin, šiljoigijn]
    šiljo+N+Pl+Abe:  šiljoittáá
